Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1505.01
Department of Environmental Quality Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Department of Environmental Quality Cash Fund which shall be used to pay the expenses of the department. The department shall remit all fees collected pursuant to subsection (9) of section 81-1505 and section 81-1521.09 to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any fee collected pursuant to section 81-1521.09 shall be used to pay the expenses related to the notice of intent for which the fee was paid. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1983, LB 356, § 8;

Laws 1987, LB 114, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 80;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 48;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 112;

Laws 1995, LB 429, § 2.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.